Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1512
Sale of cigarettes; sales outside ordinary channels.

In establishing the cost of cigarettes to the retailer or wholesaler, the invoice cost of such cigarettes purchased at a forced, bankrupt, or closeout sale, or other sale outside the ordinary channels of trade, may not be used as a basis for justifying a price lower than one based upon the replacement cost of the cigarettes to the retailer or wholesaler in the quantity last purchased through the ordinary channels of trade.

Laws 1965, c. 364, § 12, p. 1191.